Hawaii statutes.
[§588-3] Director, program administrative
staff. The program shall be headed by a director appointed by the
administrative director of the courts. The director and administrative staff
shall be subject to chapter 76. [L 1986, c 169, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 253,
§150]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next